Utah statutes.
31A-20-110.   Underwriting rules for title insurance.
(1)  No title insurance policy may be written until the title insurer or its
producer has conducted a reasonable search and examination of the title and
has made a determination of insurability of title under sound underwriting
principles.  Evidence of this search and reasonable determination shall be
retained in the files of the title insurer or its producer for not less than
15 years after the policy has been issued, either in its original form or as
recorded by any process which can accurately and reliably reproduce the
original.  This section does not apply to a company assuming liability through
a contract of reinsurance, or to a company acting as coinsurer, if another
coinsuring company has complied with this section.
(2)  No title insurance policy may be issued except by a title insurance
company or by a producer licensed under Section 31A-23a-105.
(3)  This section is enforceable only by the commissioner.  It does not
create, eliminate, or modify any private cause of action or remedy.
